Maryland, session 2025, HB1238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
29–102.
This title applies only in Somerset County.
29–1306.
(A) THERE IS A LIQUOR TASTING LICENSE.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE TO A HOLDER OF A CLASS A BEER,
WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE.
(C) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO ALLOW THE CONSUMPTION
OF LIQUOR FOR TASTING IF:
(1) THE LICENSE HOLDER IS AUTHORIZED TO SELL THE LIQUOR; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 786 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THE CONSUMER IS NOT CHARGED FOR THE LIQUOR.
(D) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY CONSUME LIQUOR AT A LIQUOR TASTING IN A
QUANTITY OF NOT MORE THAN:
(1) ONE–HALF OUNCE FROM EACH OFFERING OF LIQUOR; AND
(2) FIVE OFFERINGS IN 1 DAY.
(E) IN ADDITION TO THE COST OF THE CLASS A BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR
LICENSE, THE LIQUOR TASTING LICENSE FEES ARE:
(1) FOR A LICENSE THAT IS EFFECTIVE FOR ONLY 1 DAY IN A
LICENSING PERIOD, $20;
(2) FOR A LICENSE THAT IS EFFECTIVE FOR ANY 26 DAYS IN A
LICENSING PERIOD, $200;
(3) FOR A LICENSE THAT IS EFFECTIVE FOR ANY 52 DAYS IN A
LICENSING PERIOD, $300; AND
(4) FOR A LICENSE THAT IS EFFECTIVE FOR ANY 104 DAYS IN A
LICENSING PERIOD, $400.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –